zh-CN: 可可豆品种: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; 其他
cs: Odrůda kakaových bobů: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Jiné
es: Variedad de grano de cacao: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Otro
bg-BG: Сорт какаови зърна: Чунчо (Chuncho); Криоло (Criollo); Форастеро (Forastero); Насионал (Nacional); Тринитарио (Trinitario); Други
lt-LT: Kakavos pupelių veislė: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Kita
pl: Odmiana ziaren kakaowca: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Inne
fr: Variété de fèves de cacao: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Autre
ro-RO: Varietate de boabe de cacao: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Altele
nl: Cacaoboon ras: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Overig
de: Kakaobohnensorte: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Sonstige
en: Cacao bean variety: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Other
nb: Variant av kakaobønner: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Annet
pt-BR: Variedade de grãos de cacau: Chuncho; Criollo; Forasteiro; Nacional; Trinitário; Outra
ja: カカオ豆の種類: チュンチョ; クリオロ; フォラステロ; ナシオナル; トリニタリオ; その他
sk-SK: Odroda kakaových bôbov: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Iné
tr: Kakao çekirdeği çeşidi: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Diğer
it: varietà di fave di cacao: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Altro
el: Ποικιλία κόκκων κακάο: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Άλλο
zh-TW: 可可豆品種: 瓊丘; 克里奧羅; 佛拉斯特羅; 那席歐納; 崔尼塔利奧; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade de grãos de cacau: Chuncho; Crioulo; Forasteiro; Nacional; Trinitário; Outro
vi: Giống hạt cacao: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Khác
hr-HR: Sorta zrna kakaa: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Ostalo
sl-SI: Sorta kakavovega zrna: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Drugo
ko: 카카오 콩 품종: 춘초; 크리올로; 포라스테로; 나시오날; 트리니타리오; 기타
ru: Сорт какао-бобов: Чунчо; Криолло; Форастеро; Насьональ; Тринитарио; Другое
hu: Kakaóbab fajtája: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Egyéb
th: สายพันธุ์เมล็ดโกโก้: ชุนโช; คริโอลโล; ฟอราสเตอโร; นาซิอองนาล; ทรินิตาริโอ; อื่นๆ
sv: Kakaobönsort: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Övrigt
fi: Kaakaopapujen lajike: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Muu
da: Kakaobønnesort: Chuncho; Criollo; Forastero; Nacional; Trinitario; Andet